Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 2. Protection of Public Water Supply

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

61C Am. Jur. 2d Pollution Control § 718 to 1133; 78 Am. Jur. 2d Waterworks and Water Companies §§ 33 to 41, 46, 48 to 51, 64 to 66, 70.

Validity, construction and effect of statute or other measure involving chemical treatment of public water supply, 43 ALR2d 453.

Validity of prohibition or regulation of bathing, swimming, boating, fishing, etc., to protect public water supply, 56 ALR2d 790.

Liability of water distributor for damage caused by water escaping from main, 20 ALR3d 1294.

Applicability of rule of strict or absolute liability to overflow or escape of water caused by dam failure, 51 ALR3d 965.

Liability of water supplier for damages resulting from furnishing impure water, 54 ALR3d 936.

Validity of zoning ordinance deferring residential development until establishment of public services in area, 63 ALR3d 1184.

Standing to sue for violation of state environmental regulatory statute, 66 ALR4th 685.

39A C.J.S. Health and Environment §§ 46, 131; 94 C.J.S. Waters §§ 495 to 497.